Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF854.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.14, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 108. new text end new text begin Sergeant Joshua A. Schmit Memorial Highway. new text end new text begin That segment of marked Trunk Highway 23 in Kandiyohi County from the interchange with marked U.S. Highway 71 north of Willmar to Lake Avenue South in Spicer is designated as "Sergeant Joshua A. Schmit Memorial Highway." Subject to section 161.139, the commissioner must adopt a suitable design to mark this highway and erect appropriate signs. new text end